Maryland, session 2026, SB0001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission.
3–207.
(P) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “FACE COVERING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–535 OF
THIS TITLE.
(III) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL UNIFORM
POLICY, TO BE USED BY EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, PROHIBITING THE USE
OF A FACE COVERING BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN THE COURSE OF DUTY
CONSISTENT WITH § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 1 3
(II) THE MODEL UNIFORM POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE LANGUAGE AFFIRMING:
1. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S COMMITMENT TO
TRANSPARENCY, ACCOUNTABILITY, AND PUBLIC TRUST;
2. THAT THE AUTHORIZED USE OF FACE COVERINGS
SHALL BE LIMITED TO SPECIFIC AND CLEARLY DEFINED CIRCUMSTANCES; AND
3. THAT GENERALIZED AND UNDIFFERENTIATED FEAR
AND APPREHENSION ABOUT LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SAFETY IS NOT
SUFFICIENT TO JUSTIFY THE USE OF FACE COVERINGS.
(III) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
UNIFORM POLICY MAY ALLOW FOR USES OF FACE COVERINGS UNDER
CIRCUMSTANCES ABSOLUTELY NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE HEALTH OR SAFETY OF
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS WHILE PERFORMING PUBLIC SAFETY FUNCTIONS,
INCLUDING THE USE OF FACE COVERINGS DURING INCLEMENT WEATHER.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS OPERATING IN THE STATE SHALL ADOPT A POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THE
MODEL POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) A COUNTY, A MUNICIPALITY, OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT ADOPT A
POLICY, OTHER THAN THE UNIFORM POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION,
REGARDING THE USE OF FACE COVERINGS BY LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.
(Q) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “IDENTIFICATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–536 OF
THIS TITLE.
(III) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(IV) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 3–535 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A UNIFORM POLICY, TO
BE USED BY EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, REQUIRING THE USE OF

SENATE BILL 1
IDENTIFICATION BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER IN THE COURSE OF DUTY
CONSISTENT WITH § 3–536 OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE UNIFORM POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE LANGUAGE AFFIRMING THE STATE’S INTEREST IN:
1. PROMOTING PUBLIC SAFETY;
2. PREVENTING LAW ENFORCEMENT IMPERSONATION;
AND
3. PROMOTING TRANSPARENCY AND ACCOUNTABILITY.
(III) THE UNIFORM POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL ADDRESS:
1. THE SIZE, PLACEMENT, CONTRAST, AND LEGIBILITY
OF IDENTIFICATION, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS TO ENSURE VISIBILITY OF THE
IDENTIFICATION FROM A REASONABLE DISTANCE;
2. THE WAY IDENTIFICATION MUST BE DISPLAYED ON
DIFFERENT TYPES OF UNIFORMS, OUTERWEAR, AND PROTECTIVE CLOTHING,
INCLUDING JACKETS, VESTS, AND RAIN GEAR;
3. NARROWLY TAILORED CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH
IDENTIFICATION MAY BE TEMPORARILY OBSCURED DUE TO AN IMMEDIATE THREAT
TO LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SAFETY OR PUBLIC SAFETY AND ANY
DOCUMENTATION OR AFTER–ACTION REPORTING REQUIRED FOR DEVIATIONS; AND
4. TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR NEW AND CURRENT
LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS ON THE IDENTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–536 OF THIS TITLE.
(3) A COUNTY, A MUNICIPALITY, OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF
THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT ADOPT A POLICY,
OTHER THAN THE UNIFORM POLICY DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION, REQUIRING
THE USE OF IDENTIFICATION BY LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS.
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 1 5
(2) (I) “FACE COVERING” MEANS ANY OPAQUE MASK, GARMENT,
HELMET, HEADGEAR, OR OTHER ITEM THAT CONCEALS OR OBSCURES THE FACE OF
AN INDIVIDUAL.
(II) “FACE COVERING” INCLUDES A BALACLAVA, SKI MASK,
NECK GAITER, OR TACTICAL MASK.
(III) “FACE COVERING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A TRANSLUCENT FACE SHIELD OR CLEAR MASK THAT
DOES NOT CONCEAL THE WEARER’S FACE;
2. A MEDICAL–GRADE OR SURGICAL MASK WORN TO
PROTECT AGAINST THE TRANSMISSION OF DISEASE OR INFECTION;
3. A MASK OR AN APPARATUS, SUCH AS A
SELF–CONTAINED BREATHING APPARATUS, NECESSARY TO PROTECT AGAINST
EXPOSURE TO ANY TOXINS, GAS, SMOKE, OR OTHER HAZARDOUS OR HARMFUL
ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITION;
4. A MASK, HELMET, SELF–CONTAINED BREATHING
APPARATUS, OR OTHER DEVICE NECESSARY FOR UNDERWATER USE;
5. A MOTORCYCLE HELMET WHEN WORN BY AN
INDIVIDUAL UTILIZING A MOTORCYCLE OR OTHER VEHICLE THAT REQUIRES A
HELMET FOR SAFE OPERATIONS;
6. EYEWEAR NECESSARY TO PROTECT AN INDIVIDUAL
FROM THE USE OF RETINAL WEAPONS AND LASERS;
7. A GARMENT WORN FOR RELIGIOUS PURPOSES;
8. PROTECTIVE GEAR WORN DURING TACTICAL
OPERATIONS FOR PURPOSES OF PHYSICAL SAFETY; OR
9. ANY OTHER ITEM WORN TO FOLLOW APPLICABLE
LAWS ON OCCUPATIONAL HEALTH AND SAFETY OR REASONABLE WORKPLACE
ACCOMMODATIONS.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” INCLUDES A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY OF:
(I) THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 1
(II) ANOTHER STATE;
(III) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE OR ANOTHER
STATE; OR
(IV) THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(4) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” MEANS A SWORN MEMBER OF A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
ACTIVELY ENGAGED IN AN UNDERCOVER OPERATION.
(C) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER MAY NOT WEAR A FACE COVERING
WHILE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN THE STATE, EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED IN A
POLICY ADOPTED UNDER § 3–207(P)(3) OF THIS TITLE THE UNIFORM POLICY
ADOPTED BY THE MARYLAND POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION
UNDER § 3–207 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION:
(I) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR CIVIL OFFENSE AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $2,000 OR BOTH; AND
(II) WAIVES ALL IMMUNITY IN A CIVIL ACTION BASED ON THE
VIOLATION $1,500.
(2) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES POLICE
MISCONDUCT FOR PURPOSES OF SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ISSUE A CITATION TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO THE POLICE OFFICER HAS PROBABLE CAUSE TO
BELIEVE IS COMMITTING OR HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(2) ADJUDICATION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IS NOT A CRIMINAL CONVICTION FOR ANY PURPOSE; AND
(II) DOES NOT IMPOSE ANY OF THE CIVIL DISABILITIES THAT
MAY RESULT FROM A CRIMINAL CONVICTION.

SENATE BILL 1 7
(3) A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SIGNED BY
THE POLICE OFFICER WHO ISSUED THE CITATION AND SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER CHARGED;
(II) THE STATUTE ALLEGEDLY VIOLATED;
(III) THE DATE, LOCATION, AND TIME THAT THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED;
(IV) THE FINE THAT MAY BE IMPOSED;
(V) A NOTICE STATING THAT PREPAYMENT OF THE FINE IS
ALLOWED; AND
(VI) A NOTICE THAT STATES THAT THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
PROMPTLY SEND THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER A SUMMONS TO APPEAR FOR
TRIAL.
(4) (I) THE FORM OF THE CITATION SHALL BE UNIFORM
THROUGHOUT THE STATE AND SHALL BE PRESCRIBED BY THE DISTRICT COURT.
(II) THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
ESTABLISH A SCHEDULE FOR THE PREPAYMENT OF A FINE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(5) (I) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE POLICE OFFICER
WHO ISSUED THE CITATION SHALL FORWARD TO THE DISTRICT COURT HAVING
VENUE A COPY OF THE CITATION AND A REQUEST FOR TRIAL.
(II) THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL PROMPTLY SCHEDULE THE
CASE FOR TRIAL AND SUMMON THE DEFENDANT TO APPEAR.
(6) IN ANY PROCEEDING FOR A CIVIL OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) THE STATE HAS THE BURDEN TO PROVE THE GUILT OF THE
DEFENDANT BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE;
(II) THE COURT SHALL APPLY THE EVIDENTIARY STANDARDS AS
PRESCRIBED BY LAW OR RULE FOR THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CAUSES;

SENATE BILL 1
(III) THE COURT SHALL ENSURE THAT THE DEFENDANT HAS
RECEIVED A COPY OF THE CHARGES AGAINST THE DEFENDANT AND THAT THE
DEFENDANT UNDERSTANDS THOSE CHARGES;
(IV) THE DEFENDANT IS ENTITLED TO CROSS–EXAMINE ALL
WITNESSES WHO APPEAR AGAINST THE DEFENDANT, TO PRODUCE EVIDENCE OR
WITNESSES ON BEHALF OF THE DEFENDANT, OR TO TESTIFY ON THE DEFENDANT’S
OWN BEHALF, IF THE DEFENDANT CHOOSES TO DO SO;
(V) THE DEFENDANT IS ENTITLED TO BE REPRESENTED BY
COUNSEL OF THE DEFENDANT’S CHOICE AND AT THE EXPENSE OF THE DEFENDANT;
AND
(VI) THE DEFENDANT MAY ENTER A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NOT
GUILTY, AND THE VERDICT OF THE COURT IN THE CASE SHALL BE:
1. GUILTY OF A CIVIL OFFENSE; OR
2. NOT GUILTY OF A CIVIL OFFENSE.
(7) WHEN A DEFENDANT HAS BEEN FOUND GUILTY OF A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION AND A FINE HAS BEEN IMPOSED BY THE COURT, THE
COURT MAY DIRECT THAT THE PAYMENT OF THE FINE BE SUSPENDED OR DEFERRED
UNDER CONDITIONS THAT THE COURT MAY ESTABLISH.
(8) THE DEFENDANT MAY BE LIABLE FOR THE COSTS OF THE
PROCEEDINGS IN THE DISTRICT COURT AND FOR PAYMENT TO THE CRIMINAL
INJURIES COMPENSATION FUND.
(9) (I) A DEFENDANT WHO HAS BEEN FOUND GUILTY OF A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION HAS THE SAME RIGHT TO APPEAL OR TO FILE A
MOTION FOR A NEW TRIAL OR A MOTION FOR A REVISION OF A JUDGMENT PROVIDED
BY LAW IN THE TRIAL OF A CRIMINAL CASE.
(II) A MOTION SHALL BE MADE IN THE SAME MANNER AS
PROVIDED IN THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CASES, AND THE COURT, IN RULING ON THE
MOTION, HAS THE SAME AUTHORITY PROVIDED IN THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CASES.
(10) THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR A COUNTY MAY PROSECUTE A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS PROSECUTION OF A
VIOLATION OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE.
(11) IN A CIVIL OFFENSE CASE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE STATE’S
ATTORNEY MAY:

SENATE BILL 1 9
(I) ENTER A NOLLE PROSEQUI IN OR PLACE THE CASE ON THE
STET DOCKET; AND
(II) EXERCISE AUTHORITY IN THE SAME MANNER AS
PRESCRIBED BY LAW FOR VIOLATION OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE.
3–536.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “IDENTIFICATION” MEANS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S
AGENCY OR DEPARTMENT, LAST NAME, AND BADGE NUMBER OR OTHER
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–535 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) “LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–535 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER
WORKING IN A PLAINCLOTHES, NONUNIFORMED, OR UNDERCOVER CAPACITY.
(C) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL WEAR IDENTIFICATION ON
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER’S OUTERMOST LAYER OF CLOTHING WHILE IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN THE STATE.
(2) ON REQUEST OF ANOTHER, A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SHALL
VERBALLY DISCLOSE IDENTIFICATION WHILE IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTY IN THE
STATE.
(D) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A CIVIL OFFENSE AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $1,500.
(2) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES POLICE
MISCONDUCT FOR PURPOSES OF SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ISSUE A CITATION TO A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO THE POLICE OFFICER HAS PROBABLE CAUSE TO
BELIEVE IS COMMITTING OR HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 1
(2) ADJUDICATION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IS NOT A CRIMINAL CONVICTION FOR ANY PURPOSE; AND
(II) DOES NOT IMPOSE ANY OF THE CIVIL DISABILITIES THAT
MAY RESULT FROM A CRIMINAL CONVICTION.
(3) A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SIGNED BY
THE POLICE OFFICER WHO ISSUED THE CITATION AND SHALL CONTAIN:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER CHARGED;
(II) THE STATUTE ALLEGEDLY VIOLATED;
(III) THE DATE, LOCATION, AND TIME THAT THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED;
(IV) THE FINE THAT MAY BE IMPOSED;
(V) A NOTICE STATING THAT PREPAYMENT OF THE FINE IS
ALLOWED; AND
(VI) A NOTICE THAT STATES THAT THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
PROMPTLY SEND THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER A SUMMONS TO APPEAR FOR
TRIAL.
(4) (I) THE FORM OF THE CITATION SHALL BE UNIFORM
THROUGHOUT THE STATE AND SHALL BE PRESCRIBED BY THE DISTRICT COURT.
(II) THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
ESTABLISH A SCHEDULE FOR THE PREPAYMENT OF A FINE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(5) (I) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE POLICE OFFICER
WHO ISSUED THE CITATION SHALL FORWARD TO THE DISTRICT COURT HAVING
VENUE A COPY OF THE CITATION AND A REQUEST FOR TRIAL.
(II) THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL PROMPTLY SCHEDULE THE
CASE FOR TRIAL AND SUMMON THE DEFENDANT TO APPEAR.
(6) IN ANY PROCEEDING FOR A CIVIL OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 1 11
(I) THE STATE HAS THE BURDEN TO PROVE THE GUILT OF THE
DEFENDANT BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE;
(II) THE COURT SHALL APPLY THE EVIDENTIARY STANDARDS AS
PRESCRIBED BY LAW OR RULE FOR THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CASES;
(III) THE COURT SHALL ENSURE THAT THE DEFENDANT HAS
RECEIVED A COPY OF THE CHARGES AGAINST THE DEFENDANT AND THAT THE
DEFENDANT UNDERSTANDS THOSE CHARGES;
(IV) THE DEFENDANT IS ENTITLED TO CROSS–EXAMINE ALL
WITNESSES WHO APPEAR AGAINST THE DEFENDANT, TO PRODUCE EVIDENCE OR
WITNESSES ON BEHALF OF THE DEFENDANT, OR TO TESTIFY ON THE DEFENDANT’S
OWN BEHALF, IF THE DEFENDANT CHOOSES TO DO SO;
(V) THE DEFENDANT IS ENTITLED TO BE REPRESENTED BY
COUNSEL OF THE DEFENDANT’S CHOICE AND AT THE EXPENSE OF THE DEFENDANT;
AND
(VI) THE DEFENDANT MAY ENTER A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NOT
GUILTY, AND THE VERDICT OF THE COURT IN THE CASE SHALL BE:
1. GUILTY OF A CIVIL OFFENSE; OR
2. NOT GUILTY OF A CIVIL OFFENSE.
(7) WHEN A DEFENDANT HAS BEEN FOUND GUILTY OF A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION AND A FINE HAS BEEN IMPOSED BY THE COURT, THE
COURT MAY DIRECT THAT THE PAYMENT OF THE FINE BE SUSPENDED OR DEFERRED
UNDER CONDITIONS THAT THE COURT MAY ESTABLISH.
(8) THE DEFENDANT MAY BE LIABLE FOR THE COSTS OF THE
PROCEEDINGS IN THE DISTRICT COURT AND FOR PAYMENT TO THE CRIMINAL
INJURIES COMPENSATION FUND.
(9) (I) A DEFENDANT WHO HAS BEEN FOUND GUILTY OF A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION HAS THE SAME RIGHT TO APPEAL OR TO FILE A
MOTION FOR A NEW TRIAL OR A MOTION FOR A REVISION OF A JUDGMENT PROVIDED
BY LAW IN THE TRIAL OF A CRIMINAL CASE.
(II) A MOTION SHALL BE MADE IN THE SAME MANNER AS
PROVIDED IN THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CASES, AND THE COURT, IN RULING ON THE
MOTION, HAS THE SAME AUTHORITY PROVIDED IN THE TRIAL OF CRIMINAL CASES.

SENATE BILL 1
(10) THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR A COUNTY MAY PROSECUTE A CIVIL
OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE SAME MANNER AS PROSECUTION OF A
VIOLATION OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE.
(11) IN A CIVIL OFFENSE CASE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE STATE’S
ATTORNEY MAY:
(I) ENTER A NOLLE PROSEQUI IN OR PLACE THE CASE ON THE
STET DOCKET; AND
(II) EXERCISE AUTHORITY IN THE SAME MANNER AS
PRESCRIBED BY LAW FOR VIOLATION OF THE CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.